de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Malerwerkzeug > Farbrüttler: Manuelle Farbrüttler; Power-Shaker
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 페인트 공구 > 페인트 셰이커: 수동 셰이커; 동력 셰이커
en: Hardware > Tools > Paint Tools > Paint Shakers: Manual Shakers; Power Shakers
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Malířské nástroje > Stroje na míchání barev: Ruční stroje na míchání barev; Elektrická míchadla
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Verfbenodigdheden > Verfschudders: Handmatige schudders; Elektrische shakers
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 涂刷工具 > 油漆搅拌器: 手动搅拌器; 电动摇床
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Herramientas de pintura > Agitadoras de pinturas: Agitadoras manuales; Power shakers
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Maleredskaber > Malingsblandere: Manuelle blandere; Eldrevne shakere
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de peinture > Mélangeurs de peinture: Mélangeurs manuels; Shakers Power
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ sơn > Máy lắc sơn: Máy lắc thủ công; Máy lắc điện
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Articoli per verniciatura > Miscelatori per vernice: Miscelatori manuali; Shaker elettrici
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Orodja za barvanje > Stresalniki za barvo: Ročni stresalniki; Električni stresalniki
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia malarskie > Mieszalniki farb: Wytrząsarki ręczne; Elektryczne shakery
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Малярные инструменты > Шейкеры для краски: Ручные шейкеры; Электрические шейкеры
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Boya Aletleri > Boya Çalkalayıcılar: Manuel Çalkalayıcılar; Güç Çalkalayıcılar
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Nástroje na maľovanie > Šejkery na miešanie farby: Ručné šejkery; Elektrické šejkery
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Festőeszközök > Festékrázók: Kézi rázók; Motoros rázók
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Maleverktøy > Maleristere: Manuelle shakere; Elektriske blandere
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 塗装用品 > ペイントシェーカー: 手動シェーカー; パワーシェイカー
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Инструменти за боядисване > Уреди за смесване на бои: Ръчни уреди за смесване на бои; Електрически уреди за смесване на бои
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία βαφής > Αναδευτήρες βαφής: Χειροκίνητοι αναδευτήρες; Ηλεκτρικοί αναδευτήρες
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Målarverktyg > Färgskakare: Manuella skakare; Elblandare
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Dažymo įrankiai > Dažų purtyklės: Rankinės purtyklės; Elektrinės purtyklės
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Ferramentas para pintura > Misturadores de tinta: Misturadores manuais; Coqueteleira para suprimentos
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente pentru vopsit > Dispozitive pentru amestecat vopseaua: Dispozitive manuale pentru amestecat vopseaua; Dispozitive electrice pentru amestecat vopseaua
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 油漆工具 > 塗料混合機: 手動搖床; 電動調理罐
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas de pintura > Agitadores de tinta: Agitadores manuais; Agitadores elétricos
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือทาสี > เครื่องเขย่าสี: เครื่องเขย่าด้วยมือ; เครื่องเขย่าสีแบบไฟฟ้า
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Maalaustyökalut > Maalinsekoittajat: Manuaaliset maalinsekoittajat; Sähköravistimet
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Alati za bojanje > Vibracijske miješalice za boju: Ručne vibracijske miješalice; Električne vibracijske miješalice